Utah statutes.
16-6a-803.   Number of directors.
(1)  A board of directors shall consist of three or more directors, with the
number specified in, or fixed in accordance with, the bylaws.
(2) (a)  The bylaws may establish, or permit the voting members or the board
of directors to establish, a range for the size of the board of directors by
fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors.
(b)  If a range for the size of the board of directors is established in
accordance with Subsection (2)(a), the number of directors may be fixed or
changed from time to time within the range by:
(i)  the voting members; or
(ii)  the board of directors.
